Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Inchoate Offenses

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For case notes, “Constitutional Law—Double Jeopardy—A Constitutional Protection or a Formality to Sidestep in Successive Prosecutions?
Harvey v. State, 835 P.2d 1074,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 661 (1993).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

21 Am. Jur. 2d Criminal Law §§ 174 to 185.

22 C.J.S. Criminal Law §§ 114 to 126.

§ 6-1-301.
Attempt; renunciation of criminal intention.

A person is guilty of an attempt to commit a crime if:

With the intent to commit the crime, he does any act which is a substantial step towards commission of the crime. A “substantial step” is conduct which is strongly corroborative of the firmness of the person’s intention to complete the commission of the crime; or

He intentionally engages in conduct which would constitute the crime had the attendant circumstances been as the person believes them to be.

A person is not liable under this section if, under circumstances manifesting a voluntary and complete renunciation of his criminal intention, he avoided the commission of the crime attempted by abandoning his criminal effort. Within the meaning of this subsection, renunciation of criminal purpose is not voluntary if it is motivated, in whole or in part, by circumstances, not present or apparent at the inception of the person’s course of conduct, which increase the probability of detection or apprehension or which make more difficult the accomplishment of the criminal intention. Renunciation is not complete if it is motivated by a decision to postpone the criminal conduct until a more advantageous time or to transfer the criminal effort to another but similar objective or victim.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Constitutionality. —

Defendant was properly sentenced consecutively for the crimes for which defendant was convicted because defendant failed to demonstrate that the statutes for aggravated assault and battery and for attempted second-degree murder were unconstitutionally vague, either on their face or as applied to the facts of defendant's case. Jones v. State, 2016 WY 110, 384 P.3d 260,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2016).

No double jeopardy violation. —

Defendant's convictions for aggravated assault and battery with a deadly weapon and attempted second degree murder—which were both premised upon defendant driving a vehicle through a yard and almost striking the victim—did not violate the prohibition against double jeopardy in that malice, an element of attempted second degree murder, did not necessarily include proof of the use of a deadly weapon, an element of aggravated assault and battery with a deadly weapon. Webb v. State, 2017 WY 108, 401 P.3d 914,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2017).

Intent to Kill. —

Defendant
set a fire with an accelerant in the middle of the night directly
outside of the victim's motel room, from which she had no clear means
of escape. That combined with evidence that defendant was angry at
the victim and left town immediately after starting the fire was
sufficient
for a reasonable jury to conclude that defendant intended
to kill
the victim.
Pearson v. State, 2017 WY 19, 389 P.3d 794,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2017).

No mistrial required.—

Denial of mistrial was proper; although officer’s use of the word “meth” violated the order in limine, a curative instruction was given and there was no reasonable possibility the verdict would have been more favorable to defendant had “meth” not been mentioned, as the jury carefully analyzed the evidence and convicted defendant of attempted aggravated robbery based on evidence that he pointed a gun at the victim and demanded his keys. Langley v. State, 2020 WY 135, 474 P.3d 1130,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2020).

Consecutive sentences for attempted voluntary manslaughter. —

In a case in which defendant pleaded guilty to two counts of attempted voluntary manslaughter pursuant to a plea agreement, the district court did not err in sentencing defendant to two consecutive counts of 17 to 20 years of incarceration; while defendant's lack of prior criminal history, reports of his good character, alcohol dependence and abuse at the time of the crimes, and history of mental health issues were valid considerations in determining the reasonableness and proportionality of an appropriate sentence, so, too, were the aggravating factors presented by the prosecutor and the seriousness of defendant's conduct. Noel v. State,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. Feb. 25, 2013).

In a case in which defendant appealed his conviction for felony attempted interference with a peace officer, the Supreme Court concluded the evidence was sufficient to support the jury’s finding that a police officer was lawfully engaged in the performance of his official duties because defendant was a danger to himself, and that tackling defendant was not excessive force under the circumstances. In addition, the jury could reasonably infer from the evidence that defendant acted with the requisite specific intent when he attempted to disarm the officer by pulling on the officer’s gun with both hands. Latham v. State, 2021 WY 29, 480 P.3d 527,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2021).

Evidence sufficient to sustain conviction. —

District court did not err when it denied defendant’s motion for acquittal on attempted second-degree murder, where police officers testified that as soon as defendant heard the window break, there began a rapid succession of gunshots, and it sounded as if the defendant was rapidly moving in the officers’ direction firing.
Pickering v. State, 2020 WY 66, 464 P.3d 236,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2020).

State presented sufficient evidence at trial to show the liquid found near the broken side window was an accelerant (gasoline) and therefore that defendant took a “substantial step” toward the commission of first-degree arson. Esquibel v. State, 2022 WY 89, 513 P.3d 148,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2022).

Specific attempt statute not repealed. —

Enactment of general attempt statute did not effect repeal of former specific statute relating to attempted sexual assault, and the specific statute constituted an exception to the general statute. Capwell v. State, 686 P.2d 1148,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 322

(Wyo. 1984).

Not logically impossible for person to attempt a general intent crime. —

In trying defendant, who had robbed victim, tried to kill her, and left her for dead, the court held that it was not legally or logically impossible for a person to attempt a general intent crime; thus, the elements of an attempt and second-degree murder were not mutually exclusive. Reilly v. State, 2002 WY 156, 55 P.3d 1259,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2002).

Actual victim not required for attempted sexual exploitation and solicitation crimes. —

Where defendant engaged in conversation with an undercover detective in an internet chatroom and agreed to meet the person in an agreed-upon location for sexual activity, convictions for attempted sexual exploitation of a child and attempted solicitation to engage in illicit sexual relations in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-4-303(b)(ii) and

14-3-104

(repealed) were upheld; the State was not required to produce an actual child victim for crimes of attempt. Adams v. State, 2005 WY 94, 117 P.3d 1210,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2005).

Defendant's attempt to commit second-degree murder was complete when he stabbed victim

with the ice pick; that he stabbed her eight more times leaves little doubt but that he had attempted to kill her. If calling an ambulance saved her life, it also saved defendant from being convicted of the crime of murder and perhaps a more severe sentence, but, with respect to the attempt, that crime was complete, as he had passed beyond the point at which abandonment was legally possible. Accordingly, he was not entitled to an instruction on that defense. Ramirez v. State, 739 P.2d 1214,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 470

(Wyo. 1987).

Elements of attempted sexual assault are different from sexual assault in first degree

because of the requirement of a specific intent in the attempt statute. Sexual assault in the first degree is a general intent crime, and if the lesser offense has elements not included in the greater offense, no lesser included offense instruction is warranted. Seeley v. State, 715 P.2d 232,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 503

(Wyo. 1986).

Defendant, who attempted sexual intrusion without success, properly charged with attempted second-degree assault. —

Fourth-degree sexual assault (§

6-2-305

(repealed)) may be committed in numerous ways without committing sexual intrusion, required by § 6-2-303(a) (second-degree sexual assault). Because there is no statute specifically making attempted sexual intrusion a crime, the general attempt statute applies, and the defendant, who attempted sexual intrusion without success, was properly charged with attempted second-degree sexual assault. Bueno-Hernandez v. State, 724 P.2d 1132,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 612

(Wyo. 1986), cert. denied, 480 U.S. 907, 107 S. Ct. 1353, 94 L. Ed. 2d 523, 1987 U.S. LEXIS 1004 (U.S. 1987).

Legal impossibility is not a defense to attempt. —

Defendant did not show plain error under W.R.Cr.P. 52(b) based on prosecutorial misconduct where the prosecutor did not inform the trial court that two counts in the information did not constitute crimes. Although defendant did not, in fact, solicit a “minor” because an undercover agent was posing as the minor, defendant could have been prosecuted for attempted solicitation of a minor under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

14-3-104

(repealed) and 6-1-301(a)(ii). Legal impossibility is not a defense to attempt. Rutti v. State, 2004 WY 133, 100 P.3d 394,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. Dec. 14, 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 1019, 125 S. Ct. 1990, 161 L. Ed. 2d 858, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 3781 (U.S. 2005).

Defendant properly charged with forgery and attempted forgery, not credit card fraud. —

See Alonso v. State, 712 P.2d 355,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 446

(Wyo. 1986).

Admissibility of evidence. —

In a trial for defendant's attempt to kidnap his estranged fiancée, defendant was not entitled to present evidence of the victim's past sexual conduct at times that she was intoxicated. The trial court properly found the evidence was not relevant, despite defendant's argument that it showed his intent to protect, not harm, the victim; further, other evidence of the victim's self-endangering proclivities was before the jury.
Silva v. State, 2012 WY 37, 271 P.3d 443,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2012), reh'g denied,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. Apr. 10, 2012).

Evidence sufficient to sustain conviction. —

The court did not abuse its discretion by denying the defendant's motion for a judgment of acquittal, where a jury could infer that the victim had not consented to a sexual intrusion, and that the defendant abandoned his attempt to commit first-degree sexual assault because the victim refused to open her mouth or because he heard the police entering the victim's apartment. Cardenas v. State, 811 P.2d 989,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. June 14, 1991).

Evidence sufficient to sustain conviction of attempted sexual assault felony murder. See Murray v. State, 671 P.2d 320,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 378

(Wyo. 1983).

Sufficient evidence supported an inmate's convictions for first-degree premeditated murder, first-degree felony murder, attempt to escape from official detention, and conspiracy to escape from official detention where evidence showed the inmate (1) participated in the concerted attack upon a penitentiary's shift command center and the murder of a prison guard, (2) exultantly cried thereafter that “we got one of them,” and (3) attempted, along with two other inmates, to scale the razor wire fencing surrounding the penitentiary. Moreover, appropriate inferences from all the evidence were that the inmate intended that an escape would occur and intended that the guard be killed during the attempted escape. Harlow v. State, 2005 WY 12, 105 P.3d 1049,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 546 U.S. 835, 126 S. Ct. 63, 163 L. Ed. 2d 90, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 6229 (U.S. 2005).

Evidence was sufficient to sustain an attempted first-degree murder conviction where defendant accosted the victim, engaged him in a violent argument, challenged the victim to go outside and fight; once outside, defendant again brandished a gun and, while so armed, chased the victim back into the house and shot him through the mouth and jaw.
Mattern v. State, 2007 WY 24, 151 P.3d 1116,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 551 U.S. 1153, 127 S. Ct. 3021, 168 L. Ed. 2d 741, 2007 U.S. LEXIS 8451 (U.S. 2007).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of attempted second degree murder where the fact of the stabbing, together with testimony from the victim and other witnesses regarding defendant's confrontational behavior made it reasonable to infer that defendant stabbed the victim and did so purposely and with malice.
Guy v. State, 2008 WY 56, 184 P.3d 687,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2008), reh'g denied,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. June 19, 2008).

Evidence which included resisting arrest, having already injured one officer, being involved in a high speed car chase, giving false information, refusing to obey a second officer's instructions, trying to move his hand to retrieve a loaded and ready to fire handgun while involved in an altercation with the second officer and even after being told to stop, and later admitting that he was trying to kill the officer, was sufficient for a reasonable jury to find that defendant engaged in substantial conduct strongly corroborative of his intention to murder the second officer.
Cohen v. State, 2008 WY 78, 191 P.3d 956,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2008).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of attempted sexual abuse of a minor in the second degree because he sent messages to the victim on a social media website that stated in extremely graphic detail about his desire to have sexual intercourse and oral sex with the victim; and he took a substantial step to complete the crime as the jury could reasonably infer that defendant was driving to the apartments where he and the victim agreed to meet to pick the victim up and inflict sexual intrusion upon her. Weston v. State, 2019 WY 113, 451 P.3d 758,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2019).

Insufficient evidence. —

Defendant's conviction for attempted first degree murder in violation of this section was against the weight of the evidence which showed that he got a gun from his car during a confrontation with the victim, pointed it at the victim, and fired twice; additional evidence regarding the victim's prior involvement as the aggressor in a bar fight was relevant to defendant's self-defense claim. Therefore, defense counsel was ineffective for failing to timely file a motion for new trial, because the district court would have granted the motion in the interests of justice.
Ken v. State, 2011 WY 167, 267 P.3d 567,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2011).

Motion for judgment of acquittal. —

In an attempted first degree murder case, the trial court did not err when it denied defendant's motion for a judgment of acquittal. Taken as a whole, a jury could conclude that the acts that defendant completed before being apprehended by the police, such as having a verbal and physical altercation with the victim, attempting to run over the victim with his car, retrieving his gun, and returning to the scene of the altercation, constituted a substantial step toward the commission of first degree murder.
Gentilini v. State, 2010 WY 74, 231 P.3d 1280,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2010).

Jury instructions. —

In a prosecution for attempted first-degree sexual assault, the trial court did not commit error in combining the elements of first-degree sexual assault and attempt into one jury instruction where the instruction left no doubt as to under what circumstances the crime could be found to have been committed. Compton v. State, 931 P.2d 936,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1997).

In a prosecution for attempted first-degree sexual assault, the trial court's failure to instruct the jury on the statutory definition of “substantial step towards commission of the crime” was error, but not plain error, where the state's proof showed that the defendant attempted to force penetration on his sleeping victim. Compton v. State, 931 P.2d 936,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1997).

In instructing the jury, the trial court did not err by combining the attempt elements with the second-degree sexual assault elements; the instruction clearly set out all of the elements that the jury needed to find in order to convict. Rigler v. State, 941 P.2d 734,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1997).

Trial court did not commit plain error in instructing the jury on the elements of attempted first degree murder, where it adequately informed the jury of the elements of each crime and the circumstances that had to exist in order to find defendant guilty of those crimes.
Gentilini v. State, 2010 WY 74, 231 P.3d 1280,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2010).

In an attempted first degree murder case, the trial court did not err when it denied defendant's motion for a judgment of acquittal. Taken as a whole, a jury could conclude that the acts that defendant completed before being apprehended by the police, such as having a verbal and physical altercation with the victim, attempting to run over the victim with his car, retrieving his gun, and returning to the scene of the altercation, constituted a substantial step toward the commission of first degree murder.
Gentilini v. State, 2010 WY 74, 231 P.3d 1280,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2010).

In a trial for attempted kidnapping by removal, defendant was not entitled to an instruction on the lesser-included misdemeanor offense of attempted false imprisonment because attempted false imprisonment is not a lesser-included offense to attempt to commit kidnapping where the purported criminal conduct involved only an attempted removal of the victim with the intent to inflict bodily injury on or to terrorize her.
Silva v. State, 2012 WY 37, 271 P.3d 443,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2012), reh'g denied,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. Apr. 10, 2012).

Although the trial court erred in deriving the jury instruction defining attempt from Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-1-301

rather than Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-502(a)(i), it did not commit plain error where the instruction was not inconsistent with the ordinary meaning of attempt, and the instructions fairly and adequately covered the relevant issues and correctly stated the law. Cecil v. State, 2015 WY 158, 364 P.3d 1086,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 2015).

In a case in which defendant was charged with aggravated assault, defendant failed to establish that either plain error or an abuse of discretion occurred when the district court did not give an instruction defining attempt. Sam v. State, 2017 WY 98, 401 P.3d 834,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2017), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 1988, 201 L. Ed. 2d 248, 2018 U.S. LEXIS 3049 (U.S. 2018).

Although the district court erred by failing to define substantial step for the jury and by including the concept of attempt in the elements of second-degree sexual abuse of a minor when instructing the jury, counsel was not ineffective in failing to object to the instructions as defendant was not prejudiced by the failure to object because the evidence against him was overwhelming as defendant’s statements over several weeks confirmed he had the specific intent to inflict sexual intrusion upon the victim and his actions were strongly corroborative of the firmness of his intention to complete the crime of second-degree sexual abuse of a minor. Weston v. State, 2019 WY 113, 451 P.3d 758,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2019).

Whether or
not the malice instruction given in defendant's case constituted
plain
error, defendant was not materially prejudiced by the malice
instruction
given in defendant's trial for attempted first degree
murder because
defendant could not show that defendant was materially
prejudiced
in that the evidence presented was more than sufficient
to persuade
a reasonable jury that defendant acted with the intent
to kill, without
legal justification or excuse, and in a manner indicating
hatred,
ill will, or hostility. Johnson v. State, 2015 WY 118, 356 P.3d 767,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2015).

Specific intent instruction. —

Wyoming does not require that particular words be used to properly instruct on the specific intent element of the crime of attempt. Compton v. State, 931 P.2d 936,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1997).

On plain error review, defendant was entitled to reversal of his conviction for attempted second degree murder because the trial court violated Wyo. R. Evid. 303(b) and the Fourteenth Amendment when it failed to instruct the jury that presumptions of malice and specific intent raised from the use of a deadly weapon were not mandatory presumptions.
Hernandez v. State, 2007 WY 105, 162 P.3d 472,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2007).

In a case where defendant was charged with attempted second degree sexual abuse of a minor in Count III of the information, after being questioned by the jury regarding what act defendant was accused of attempting to commit in Count III, the district court did not err in providing a supplemental jury instruction consistent with the information that the act alleged in Count III was the attempted touching of the victim's vaginal area. Brown v. State, 2015 WY 4, 340 P.3d 1020,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2015).

Sentence for both attempt, completed crime unconstitutional. —

Where the defendant was convicted and sentenced for both attempted sexual assault in the third degree and completed sexual assault in the third degree, entry of judgment on both charges was barred by double jeopardy. A person may not be convicted and sentenced for both the attempt and the completed crime. Craney v. State, 798 P.2d 1202,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1990).

Renunciation and abandonment are not available as defenses after actor has injured victim. —

SeeApodaca v. State, 796 P.2d 806,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1990);
Harris v. State, 933 P.2d 1114,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1997).

The existence of the victim's injuries consisting of a number of bruises and abrasions and a broken nose, together with defendant's admission that he hit her, was sufficient to negate defendant's renunciation defense. Harris v. State, 933 P.2d 1114,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1997).

Renunciation not available as defense where victim resists. —

Defendant did not completely and voluntarily renounce his criminal intentions in accordance with this section by shoving his victim out of his vehicle after the victim resisted defendant's attempts to sexually assault her. Harris v. State, 933 P.2d 1114,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1997).

Sentencing Ranges. —

In defendant's attempted second degree murder case, the court's error in failing to properly advise defendant pursuant to Wyo. R. Crim. P. 11 was not harmless because, had the court recited the minimum and maximum penalties at the change of plea hearing, the fact that the State could not recommend a maximum sentence of 20 years would have become obvious. Thus, the court's acceptance of a plea agreement which included an illegal sentence recommendation further undermined the validity of defendant's no contest pleas.
Thomas v. State, 2007 WY 186, 170 P.3d 1254,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 2007).

No double jeopardy violation. —

Defendant's prosecution for attempted kidnapping, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-1-301(a)(i) and

6-2-201

, was not barred by the doctrine of double jeopardy due to defendant's earlier guilty plea to battery because battery, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(b), was not a lesser-included offense of attempted kidnapping under the same-elements test.
Rathbun v. State, 2011 WY 116, 257 P.3d 29,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2011).

Defendant was properly sentenced consecutively for the crimes for which defendant was convicted because there was no double jeopardy violation in that aggravated assault and battery was not the same offense as attempted second-degree murder pursuant to the same-elements test. Jones v. State, 2016 WY 110, 384 P.3d 260,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2016).

Jury Instructions. —

Defendant's conviction for attempted second-degree murder was proper because the jury instructions, as a whole, adequately informed the jury that it had to find that defendant acted purposely and maliciously; the instructions were not in clear and obvious violation of an established and unequivocal rule of law.
Burnett v. State, 2011 WY 169, 267 P.3d 1083,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2011).

Applied

in

Shepard v. State, 720 P.2d 904,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 571

(Wyo. 1986); Barron v. State, 819 P.2d 412,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1991).

Quoted

in

Osborn v. State, 672 P.2d 777,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1983); Brown v. State, 703 P.2d 1097,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 519

(Wyo. 1985); Jones v. State, 735 P.2d 699,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 440

(Wyo. 1987); Horton v. State, 764 P.2d 674,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1988); Price v. State, 807 P.2d 909,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1991); Bilderback v. State, 13 P.3d 249

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 218

(Wyo. 2000); Harlow v. State, 2003 WY 47, 70 P.3d 179,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2003); Deshazer v. State, 2003 WY 98, 74 P.3d 1240,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2003).

Stated

in

Haight v. State, 654 P.2d 1232,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1982); Brooks v. State, 706 P.2d 664,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Evans v. State, 653 P.2d 308,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1982); State v. Laude, 654 P.2d 1223,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1982); Stice v. State, 799 P.2d 1204,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1990); Dichard v. State, 844 P.2d 484,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 207

(Wyo. 1992); Hansen v. State, 904 P.2d 811,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1995); McAdams v. State, 2003 WY 104, 75 P.3d 665,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 2003); Beck v. State, 2005 WY 56, 110 P.3d 898,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(2005); Thomas v. State, 2009 WY 92, 211 P.3d 509,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(July 15, 2009); Landeroz v. State, 2011 WY 168, 267 P.3d 1075,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Dec. 28, 2011).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For case note, “CRIMINAL LAW — Wyoming Limits the Availability of Abandonment as a Defense to Criminal Attempt. Ramirez v. State, 739 P.2d 1214,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 470

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 219 (1989).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of state statute governing impossibility of consummation as defense to prosecution for attempt to commit crime, 41 ALR4th 588.

Attempt to commit assault as criminal offense, 93 ALR5th 683.

§ 6-1-302.
Solicitation to commit felony; renunciation of criminal intention.

A person is guilty of solicitation to commit a felony if, with intent that a felony be committed, he commands, encourages or facilitates the commission of that crime under circumstances strongly corroborative of the intention that the crime be committed but the solicited crime is not attempted or committed.

A person is not liable under this section if, after soliciting another person to commit a crime, he persuaded the other person not to do so or otherwise prevented the commission of the crime, under circumstances manifesting a voluntary and complete renunciation of his criminal intention.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Stated

in

Brown v. State, 703 P.2d 1097,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 519

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

State v. Laude, 654 P.2d 1223,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect of statute making solicitation to commit crime a substantive offense, 51 ALR2d 953.

Solicitation to commit crime against more than one person or property, made in single conversation, as single or multiple crimes, 24 ALR4th 1324.

Sufficiency of evidence of instigating or assisting escape from federal custody, under 18 USC § 752(a), 74 ALR Fed 816.